Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1216
Council; continuing legal education; duties.

The council shall be responsible for establishing the annual number of hours of continuing legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children. The council shall periodically review the required number of hours of continuing legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children. The council shall develop educational criteria, formats, and program objectives to be used in the delivery of continuing legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, for county attorneys and deputy county attorneys, except that the annual number of hours spent in continuing legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, shall not exceed thirty-six contact hours.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 5;

Laws 1990, LB 1246, § 2.